public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A ergixar argixege ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixemo/L ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixen/L ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixendo/E ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixene ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixeni/M ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixense ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixese/I ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixesi ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixesta/I ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixeste/I ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixesti/I ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixesto/I ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixeva/JLPR ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixeve/JL ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixevi/NP ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixevo/JL ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixi/N ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixion/L ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixione ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixioni/M ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixionse ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixisen/L ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixisene ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixiseni/M ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixisense ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixision/L ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixisione ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixisioni/M ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixisionse ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixisié/P ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixisiéde/P ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixisiége/P ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixison/L ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixisone ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixisoni/M ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixisonse ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixiven/L ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixiveni/M ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixivense ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixivion/L ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixivioni/M ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixivionse ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixivié/P ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixiviéu/Q ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixivon/L ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixivoni/M ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixivonse ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixié/P ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixiéde/P ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixiége/P ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixiéu/Q ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixo/JL ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixon/L ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixone ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixoni/M ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixonse ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixà/ ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàa/JLPR ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàami/K ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàau/Q ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàe/JL ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàelo/S ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàemi/K ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixài/NP ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàimo/L ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàimoi/M ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàitu/O ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàndome/G ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàndomene/G ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixào/JL ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàomi/K ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàrmene/G ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàsimo ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàvami/K ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàvau/Q ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàvelo/S ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàvemi/K ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàvimo/L ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàvimoi/M ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàvitu/O ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixàvomi/K ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixè/FP ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixème/H ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixèu/Q ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixé/FP ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixéa/JLPR ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixéami/K ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixéau/Q ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixée/JL ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixéelo/S ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixéemi/K ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixéi/NP ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixéimo/L ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixéimoi/M ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixéitu/O ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixémoi/M ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixéndome/G ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixéndomene/G ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixéo/JL ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixéomi/K ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixésimo ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixéu/Q ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixévami/K ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixévau/Q ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixévelo/S ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixévemi/K ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixévimo/L ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixévimoi/M ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixévitu/O ergixar
SFX A ergixar argixévomi/K ergixar
SFX A ergixar argíxelo/S ergixar
SFX A ergixar argíxeme/H ergixar
SFX A ergixar argíxemi/K ergixar
SFX A ergixar argíxitu/O ergixar
SFX A ergixar argíxomi/K ergixar
SFX A ergiđar argiđa/FR ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđada ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđade ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđadi ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđado ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđando/E ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđante/ ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđar/E ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaralo/S ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarami/K ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaratu/O ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarave/RT ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđare ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaremo/L ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaren/L ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđareni/M ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarense ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaresi/P ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaresiu/Q ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarion/L ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarioni/M ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarionse ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarisen/L ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđariseni/M ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarisense ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarision/L ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarisioni/M ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarisionse ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarisié/P ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarisiéu/Q ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarison/L ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarisoni/M ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarisonse ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarié/P ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđariéu/Q ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarme/G ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaron/L ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaroni/M ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaronse ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarà/JLNR ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaràe/R ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarè/JL ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarèmi/K ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaré/P ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarémoi/M ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarésimo/L ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarésimoi/M ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaréu/Q ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaría/JLNR ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaríami/K ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaríatu/O ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaríe/JLR ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaríelo/S ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaríemi/K ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđarò/JL ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaròmi/K ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđase/I ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđasi ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđasta/I ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđaste/I ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđasti/I ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđasto/I ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđava/JLPR ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđave/JL ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđavi/NP ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđavo/JL ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđe/IJLR ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđede ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđege ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđemo/L ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđen/L ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđendo/E ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđene ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđeni/M ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđense ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđese/I ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđesi ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđesta/I ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđeste/I ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđesti/I ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđesto/I ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđeva/JLPR ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđeve/JL ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđevi/NP ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđevo/JL ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđi/N ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđion/L ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđione ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđioni/M ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđionse ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđisen/L ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđisene ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđiseni/M ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđisense ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđision/L ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđisione ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđisioni/M ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđisionse ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđisié/P ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđisiéde/P ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđisiége/P ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđison/L ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđisone ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđisoni/M ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđisonse ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđiven/L ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđiveni/M ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđivense ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđivion/L ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđivioni/M ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđivionse ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđivié/P ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđiviéu/Q ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđivon/L ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđivoni/M ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđivonse ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđié/P ergiđar
SFX A ergiđar argiđiéde/P ergiđar
