public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
aƚar/A
alegrar/A
alŧetar/A
traxandar/A
arar/A
ardenar/A
aromatidar/A
asúmer/A
inasidar/A
reaver/A
badajar/A
xbaiƚar/A
balar/A
inbalbar/A
dexbaƚonar/A
inbalŧar/A
xbandir/A
bañar/A
xbarasar/A
barkiđar/A
strabastar/A
batixar/A
baukar/A
xbavesar/A
bekar/A
inberlar/A
xbesolar/A
inbiankar/A
xbiaxemar/A
bindar/A
bisar/A
bixigolar/A
sobójer/A
xbokar/A
inboƚoñar/A
bonbar/A
xborir/A
borondolar/A
botedar/A
inboŧar/A
brakixar/A
bramar/A
abraŧar/A
xbregar/A
brinkar/A
inbrokar/A
brontoƚar/A
bruxar/A
inbuƚir/A
dexbutar/A
xbuxolar/A
scarexar/A
censir/A
ascéñer/A
cicoƚar/A
cokiđar/A
indir/A
datar/A
denteƚar/A
dexeñar/A
díxer/A
dojiđar/A
dolsir/A
redonar/A
indormensar/A
indreŧar/A
dedúxer/A
xaƚixar/A
đenerar/A
dogolar/A
inđónxer/A
đovar/A
xular/A
èrder/A
reelèđer/A
dexeredar/A
exaɉerar/A
exular/A
tumefar/A
infaldar/A
desfamar/A
sfangar/A
fatalidar/A
infasoƚar/A
klasifegar/A
fegurar/A
fénxer/A
deskonfermar/A
enfiar/A
sfiapir/A
refifar/A
strafilar/A
definir/A
sfioridar/A
fitar/A
fodrar/A
folar/A
sfondrar/A
reformar/A
refornir/A
fosinar/A
infrankar/A
sfrapuñar/A
sfrasar/A
sfregolar/A
fritegar/A
sfroxar/A
sfugaŧar/A
furbir/A
fuxiƚar/A
galdir/A
ingaƚonar/A
xganbetar/A
xgarbar/A
xgargatar/A
ingatolar/A
xginŧar/A
ingoƚoxir/A
gorgexar/A
xgrafar/A
dexgranelar/A
gratar/A
xgravar/A
xgrénder/A
griliar/A
dexgritolir/A
xgrixoƚir/A
gruar/A
gualivar/A
guernar/A
inguxelar/A
indovinar/A
inisiar/A
inraukir/A
subintrar/A
tranxitar/A
xɉansar/A
inɉavetar/A
dexjemar/A
dexjonfar/A
xjoŧar/A
jubiƚar/A
skacidar/A
skagaŧar/A
reskaldar/A
kalkixolar/A
deskalsar/A
kaƚuñar/A
kanexar/A
inkankrenar/A
skantinar/A
kapejar/A
inkapriŧiar/A
inkaratelar/A
skarnir/A
kartar/A
deskartoŧar/A
kastrar/A
deskatiɉar/A
inkaŧar/A
eskavar/A
inkaveŧar/A
proklamar/A
akòjer/A
inkokonar/A
koƚorar/A
rekomandar/A
deskonir/A
inkonkolar/A
konseliar/A
kontrir/A
konxeturar/A
rekórer/A
akòrđer/A
inkorlar/A
korsiđar/A
kostumar/A
skovar/A
koxinar/A
krestalixar/A
skrokar/A
krostolinar/A
krusiar/A
kucar/A
kuereƚar/A
inkuƚar/A
inkuñar/A
kuŧolar/A
lagremar/A
lanpiđar/A
ƚapasar/A
straƚasar/A
laurear/A
ƚedrar/A
legalixar/A
ƚeskar/A
soƚevar/A
ekuilibrar/A
likar/A
ƚindar/A
lisiar/A
ƚogar/A
xlontanar/A
luamar/A
lusar/A
luxingar/A
mainar/A
xmaltar/A
manestrar/A
mantedar/A
xmarar/A
marixar/A
inmarŧir/A
inmaskarar/A
xmatixar/A
inmasetar/A
destrameđar/A
tramexar/A
remenar/A
xmeolar/A
xmersiar/A
prométer/A
mijorar/A
remirar/A
moduƚar/A
moƚar/A
xmojar/A
stramontar/A
inmorbar/A
mormoƚar/A
motexar/A
mudar/A
dexmunegar/A
mutiƚar/A
xnaređar/A
naxar/A
xnervađar/A
nisar/A
nolixar/A
nòxer/A
xñanfidar/A
xñokoƚar/A
ofrir/A
oƚiar/A
ondular/A
opiniar/A
organeđar/A
ortigar/A
oxeƚar/A
inpadronir/A
spaɉar/A
palentar/A
paliđar/A
palpuñar/A
konpaniđar/A
spansar/A
desparir/A
desparedar/A
spartar/A
inpasir/A
spasixar/A
patir/A
inpasar/A
spaventar/A
rapegar/A
speƚar/A
inpeƚukar/A
dispénder/A
inpeneƚar/A
spentonar/A
peritar/A
peskar/A
petexar/A
despetorar/A
inpesolatar/A
sopiantar/A
inpicinar/A
spikar/A
piñatar/A
spipoƚar/A
pistoređar/A
spisegar/A
konplegar/A
spolinar/A
polverixar/A
inpóner/A
spongar/A
despontelar/A
ponxetar/A
soportar/A
postiƚar/A
repovolar/A
prestar/A
raprexentar/A
provokar/A
putanixar/A
rajar/A
rasir/A
rekuiđir/A
resteƚar/A
dexrisoƚar/A
derokir/A
ropetar/A
inruxenir/A
sabolar/A
saldar/A
sanjotar/A
scantiđar/A
sekolarixar/A
deskonseɉar/A
insensar/A
konservar/A
sidiar/A
sisoƚar/A
skarabocar/A
skenar/A
skòter/A
insoaŧar/A
solfiđar/A
sordir/A
sparpaɉar/A
respetar/A
spiumasar/A
sorastar/A
stanpeƚar/A
destilar/A
instokar/A
astrénxer/A
strufiñar/A
suefar/A
insutiƚir/A
takixar/A
taredar/A
intavelar/A
intenerir/A
asteñir/A
retéñer/A
protèxer/A
stokidar/A
tonfolar/A
destòrđer/A
sotràer/A
trapanar/A
trebiar/A
trinŧar/A
truŧidar/A
ŧapar/A
resexar/A
ŧercar/A
insetar/A
sigolar/A
ŧirkolar/A
inŧopar/A
unir/A
valer/A
xvaporar/A
xveɉar/A
ventiƚar/A
intervèñer/A
vergolar/A
pervertir/A
divíder/A
viŧar/A
revokar/A
involtoƚar/A
xàser/A
konxeñar/A
xmergolar/A
xustiŧiar/A
regoƚarixar/A
evidensiar/A
reèser/A
fraŧar/A
inŧerpidir/A
saƚar/A
xgargotar/A
takoƚar/A
